Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-486
Operator's license;
license suspended or revoked; effect; appeal.

(1)
No person shall be licensed to operate a motor vehicle by the State of Nebraska
if such person has an operator's license currently under suspension or revocation
in this state or any other state or jurisdiction in the United States.

(2) If a license is issued to a person while his or her operator's
license was suspended or revoked in this state or any other state or jurisdiction,
the Department of Motor Vehicles may cancel the license upon forty-five days'
written notice by regular
United States mail to the licensee's last-known address. The cancellation
may be appealed as provided in section 60-4,105.

(3) When such a person presents to the department an official
notice from the state or jurisdiction that suspended or revoked his or her
motor vehicle operator's license that such suspension or revocation has been
terminated, he or she may then be licensed to operate a motor vehicle by the
State of Nebraska.

Laws 1986, LB 153, § 7;

R.S.1943, (1988), § 60-403.05;

Laws 1989, LB 285, § 37;

Laws 1999, LB 704, § 6;

Laws 2001, LB 38, § 13;

Laws 2012, LB751, § 19.